North Carolina, session 2025, HB944.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Central Management and Support, Office of Rural
Health, the sum of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated as a directed grant to support the operations of Care
Ring, Inc., a nonprofit community health clinic located in Mecklenburg County that provides
primary care services to medically vulnerable residents who would otherwise be unable to receive
needed primary care services due to geographic, economic, or other barriers.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H944-v-1*